Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202568-2202
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) Wide discrepancies between medicaid reimbursement rates and rates of other payers have created challenges to health care access for Nebraska residents covered by medicaid;

(2) Approximately one-third of pregnant women, newborns, and children are covered by medicaid and access to health care services is critical for them. Access to labor and delivery services is critical to fostering healthy mothers and babies;

(3) Access to primary care is vital to the health of Nebraska communities. Investment in preventative care will help reduce future health care costs to the state and its residents. Improved health outcomes are more likely when patients have access to, and positive relationships with, their primary care provider;

(4) Health care access challenges in rural areas have reached a critical point, which requires bold investment and leadership from the state to maintain the health of our rural citizens and communities; and

(5) Investment in physical health care access and quality in the medicaid program is an investment in bolstering Nebraska's health care landscape as a whole, addressing health care deserts across the state, and improving the health and prosperity of Nebraska communities.

Laws 2025, LB527, § 2.